District of Columbia statutes.
4-753.03

Grace period for establishing residency.

An individual or family seeking shelter during severe weather conditions may be afforded a 3-day grace period to establish District residency.

Oct. 22, 2005, D.C. Law 16-35, § 8a
as added Apr. 8, 2011, D.C. Law 18-367, § 2(d), 58 DCR 987
For temporary (90 day) addition of section, see § 5102 of Fiscal Year 2013 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2012 (D.C. Act 19-383, June 19, 2012, 59 DCR 7764).
For temporary (90 day) addition of section, see § 5102 of Fiscal Year 2013 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2012 (D.C. Act 19-413, July 25, 2012, 59 DCR 9290).